Arkansas, session 2025, SB233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) Reform Arkansas trust tax law to increase the state's
competitiveness in the financial services sector by attracting out-of-state
trust assets for administration by Arkansas trustees;
(2) Recognize that Arkansas citizens currently establish trusts
in foreign states to avoid trust-level taxation;
(3) Recognize that foreign states are reaping the benefit that
comes with the management and administration of trust assets in those states;
and
(4) Amend the law to remove the incentive for Arkansas residents
to set up nongrantor trusts in foreign states that will encourage Arkansans
to keep trust assets in state where Arkansas trustees will manage and
administer the trust assets.
*JLL182*
02/13/2025 3:36:48 PM JLL182

SB233

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 3, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-317. Nongrantor trusts.
There is allowed an exemption from the income tax imposed under this
chapter for a trust that is administered by a trustee who is a resident of
this state if the trust is not considered a grantor trust under 26 U.S.C. §
671 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025, and any related regulations,
as they existed on January 1, 2025.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is effective for tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2025.
























02/13/2025 3:36:48 PM JLL182